Utah statutes.
20A-9-602.   Write-in candidacy and voting prohibited in certain circumstances.

In elections for county attorney or district attorney that meet the requirements of Subsections 20A-6-302(3) and (4), a person may not file a declaration of candidacy as a write-in candidate under this part and the county clerk may not count any write-in votes received for the office of county or district attorney.

